ext/spell/pt_BR.aff
SFX i N 293
SFX i   0      m        ra
SFX i   0      s        ra
SFX i   r      i        for
SFX i   r      mos      for
SFX i   0      a        for
SFX i   0      am       for
SFX i   0      as       for
SFX i   0      des      for
SFX i   0      em       for
SFX i   0      es       for
SFX i   0      mos      for
SFX i   r      sse      for
SFX i   r      ssem     for
SFX i   r      sses     for
SFX i   r      ste      for
SFX i   r      stes     for
SFX i   or     ui       for
SFX i   or     ôramos   for
SFX i   or     ôreis    for
SFX i   or     ôsseis   for
SFX i   or     ôssemos  for
SFX i   r      de      ser
SFX i   r      ja      ser
SFX i   r      jais      ser
SFX i   r      jam      ser
SFX i   r      jamos      ser
SFX i   r      jas      ser
SFX i   r      ndo      ser
SFX i   0      des      ser
SFX i   0      ei      ser
SFX i   0      eis      ser
SFX i   0      em      ser
SFX i   0      emos      ser
SFX i   0      es      ser
SFX i   0      ia      ser
SFX i   0      iam      ser
SFX i   0      ias      ser
SFX i   0      mos      ser
SFX i   0      á      ser
SFX i   0      ás      ser
SFX i   0      ão      ser
SFX i   0      íamos      ser
SFX i   0      íeis      ser
SFX i   er     ido      ser
SFX i   er     ois      ser
SFX i   er     omos      ser
SFX i   er     ou      ser
SFX i   er     ão      ser
SFX i   er     ê      ser
SFX i   s      ramos      és
SFX i   s      reis      és
SFX i   r      m      ter
SFX i   r      mos      ter
SFX i   r      nde      ter
SFX i   r      ndes      ter
SFX i   r      ndo      ter
SFX i   r      nha      ter
SFX i   r      nhais      ter
SFX i   r      nham      ter
SFX i   r      nhamos      ter
SFX i   r      nhas      ter
SFX i   r      nho      ter
SFX i   r      ns      ter
SFX i   0      des      ter
SFX i   0      ei      ter
SFX i   0      eis      ter
SFX i   0      em      ter
SFX i   0      emos      ter
SFX i   0      es      ter
SFX i   0      ia      ter
SFX i   0      iam      ter
SFX i   0      ias      ter
SFX i   0      mos      ter
SFX i   0      á      ter
SFX i   0      ás      ter
SFX i   0      ão      ter
SFX i   0      íamos      ter
SFX i   0      íeis      ter
SFX i   r      ve      ter
SFX i   er     ido      ter
SFX i   er     inha      ter
SFX i   er     inham      ter
SFX i   er     inhas      ter
SFX i   er     ive      ter
SFX i   er     ivemos      ter
SFX i   er     iver      ter
SFX i   er     ivera      ter
SFX i   er     iveram      ter
SFX i   er     iveras      ter
SFX i   er     iverdes      ter
SFX i   er     iverem      ter
SFX i   er     iveres      ter
SFX i   er     ivermos      ter
SFX i   er     ivesse      ter
SFX i   er     ivessem      ter
SFX i   er     ivesses      ter
SFX i   er     iveste      ter
SFX i   er     ivestes      ter
SFX i   er     ivéramos      ter
SFX i   er     ivéreis      ter
SFX i   er     ivésseis      ter
SFX i   er     ivéssemos      ter
SFX i   er     êm        ter
SFX i   er     ínhamos      ter
SFX i   er     ínheis      ter
SFX i   ver    ja      haver
SFX i   ver    jais      haver
SFX i   ver    jam      haver
SFX i   ver    jamos      haver
SFX i   ver    jas      haver
SFX i   r      i      haver
SFX i   r      is      haver
SFX i   r      mos      haver
SFX i   r      ndo      haver
SFX i   0      des      haver
SFX i   0      ei      haver
SFX i   0      eis      haver
SFX i   0      em      haver
SFX i   0      emos      haver
SFX i   0      es      haver
SFX i   0      ia      haver
SFX i   0      iam      haver
SFX i   0      ias      haver
SFX i   0      mos      haver
SFX i   0      á      haver
SFX i   0      ás      haver
SFX i   0      ão      haver
SFX i   0      íamos      haver
SFX i   0      íeis      haver
SFX i   er     ia      haver
SFX i   er     iam      haver
SFX i   er     ias      haver
SFX i   er     ido      haver
SFX i   er     íamos      haver
SFX i   er     íeis      haver
SFX i   aver   ei      haver
SFX i   aver   ouve      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvemos      haver
SFX i   aver   ouver      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvera      haver
SFX i   aver   ouveram      haver
SFX i   aver   ouveras      haver
SFX i   aver   ouverdes      haver
SFX i   aver   ouverem      haver
SFX i   aver   ouveres      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvermos      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvesse      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvessem      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvesses      haver
SFX i   aver   ouveste      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvestes      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvéramos      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvéreis      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvésseis      haver
SFX i   aver   ouvéssemos      haver
SFX i   aver   á      haver
SFX i   aver   ás      haver
SFX i   aver   ão      haver
SFX i   r      a      ir
SFX i   r      am     ir
SFX i   r      as     ir
SFX i   r      de     ir
SFX i   r      des    ir
SFX i   r      do     ir
SFX i   r      ndo    ir
SFX i   0      des    ir
SFX i   0      ei     ir
SFX i   0      eis    ir
SFX i   0      em     ir
SFX i   0      emos   ir
SFX i   0      es     ir
SFX i   0      ia     ir
SFX i   0      iam    ir
SFX i   0      ias    ir
SFX i   0      mos    ir
SFX i   0      á      ir
SFX i   0      ás     ir
SFX i   0      ão     ir
SFX i   0      íamos  ir
SFX i   0      íeis   ir
SFX i   á      ades   vá
SFX i   á      ai     vá
SFX i   á      ais    vá
SFX i   á      amos   vá
SFX i   á      ou     vá
SFX i   0      s      vá
SFX i   á      ão     vá
SFX i   r      0      poder
SFX i   r      is      poder
SFX i   r      m      poder
SFX i   r      mos      poder
SFX i   r      ndo      poder
SFX i   0      des      poder
SFX i   0      ei      poder
SFX i   0      eis      poder
SFX i   0      em      poder
SFX i   0      emos      poder
SFX i   0      es      poder
SFX i   0      ia      poder
SFX i   0      iam      poder
SFX i   0      ias      poder
SFX i   0      mos      poder
SFX i   0      á      poder
SFX i   0      ás      poder
SFX i   0      ão      poder
SFX i   0      íamos      poder
SFX i   0      íeis      poder
SFX i   r      s      poder
SFX i   er     ia      poder
SFX i   er     iam      poder
SFX i   er     ias      poder
SFX i   er     ido      poder
SFX i   er     íamos      poder
SFX i   er     íeis      poder
SFX i   der    ssa      poder
SFX i   der    ssais      poder
SFX i   der    ssam      poder
SFX i   der    ssamos      poder
SFX i   der    ssas      poder
SFX i   der    sso      poder
SFX i   oder   ude      poder
SFX i   oder   udemos      poder
SFX i   oder   uder      poder
SFX i   oder   udera      poder
SFX i   oder   uderam      poder
SFX i   oder   uderas      poder
SFX i   oder   uderdes      poder
SFX i   oder   uderem      poder
SFX i   oder   uderes      poder
SFX i   oder   udermos      poder
SFX i   oder   udesse      poder
SFX i   oder   udessem      poder
SFX i   oder   udesses      poder
SFX i   oder   udeste      poder
SFX i   oder   udestes      poder
SFX i   oder   udéramos      poder
SFX i   oder   udéreis      poder
SFX i   oder   udésseis      poder
SFX i   oder   udéssemos      poder
SFX i   oder   ôde      poder
SFX i   rer    ira      querer
SFX i   rer    irais      querer
SFX i   rer    iram      querer
SFX i   rer    iramos      querer
SFX i   rer    iras      querer
SFX i   rer    r      querer
SFX i   r      i      querer
SFX i   r      is      querer
SFX i   r      m      querer
SFX i   r      mos      querer
SFX i   r      ndo      querer
SFX i   0      des      querer
SFX i   0      ei      querer
SFX i   0      eis      querer
SFX i   0      em      querer
SFX i   0      emos      querer
SFX i   0      es      querer
SFX i   0      ia      querer
SFX i   0      iam      querer
SFX i   0      ias      querer
SFX i   0      mos      querer
SFX i   0      á      querer
SFX i   0      ás      querer
SFX i   0      ão      querer
SFX i   0      íamos      querer
SFX i   0      íeis      querer
SFX i   r      s      querer
SFX i   er     ia      querer
SFX i   er     iam      querer
SFX i   er     ias      querer
